apertium-ces-ces.ces_han.dix
    <pardef n="prpers__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>já</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>tê</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>on</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ona</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ono</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>mê</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>vê</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oni</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>one</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>one</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>mně</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>mě</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>tebe</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>tě</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ho</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>jeho</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>něho</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="ppr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ji</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ho</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>jeho</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>něho</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="ppr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nás</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>vás</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>jich</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nich</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="ppr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nich</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="ppr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>mně</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>mi</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>tobě</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>tě</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>mô</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>jemô</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>němô</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="ppr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ji</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ni</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="ppr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>mô</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>jemô</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>němô</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="ppr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nám</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>vám</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>jim</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nim</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="ppr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>mne</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>mně</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>tebe</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>tě</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ho</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>jeho</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>něho</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="ppr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>jô</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ňô</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="ppr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ho</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>jeho</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>něho</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="ppr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nás</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>vás</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>

    <e lm="prpers"><i></i><par n="prpers__prn"/></e>
